Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2277
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 29-2277 to 29-2279, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Agency means any public or governmental unit, institution, division, or agency or any private nonprofit organization which provides services intended to enhance the social welfare or general well-being of the community, which agrees to accept community service from offenders and to supervise and report the progress of such community service to the court or its representative;

(2) Community correctional facility or program has the same meaning as in section 47-621; and

(3) Community service means uncompensated labor for an agency to be performed by an offender when the offender is not working or attending school.

Laws 1986, LB 528, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB259, § 7.